Nebraska, session 109, LB763.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB763 LB763
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 83-196, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-196 (1) Three members of the Board of Parole shall constitute a
quorum for the purpose of transacting any official business. The
decisions of the Board of Parole shall be by majority vote. The board
shall keep a record of its acts and shall notify the Director of
Correctional Services of its decisions relating to offenders who are or
have been committed.
(2)(a) A gathering of three or more of the members of the Board of
Parole shall not constitute a meeting subject to the Open Meetings Act
when the purpose of such gathering is limited to:
(i) Strategic planning related to the board's operations or
communications or interagency coordination;
(ii) Process improvement or business procedure development,
including workflow, documentation, or data systems;
(iii) Internal education, training, or information sharing designed
to improve member understanding of parole laws, policies, or best
practices; or
(iv) Discussion of administrative or procedural matters that do not
involve deliberation, recommendation, or decision regarding the grant,
denial, deferral, or revocation of parole for any specific individual.
(b) No action shall be taken at a gathering described in this
subsection to make or influence decisions on specific parole cases. All
formal decisions regarding parole shall occur only during duly convened
public meetings that are held in compliance with the Open Meetings Act.
(c) In order to ensure continued transparency and compliance with
the Open Meetings Act, the Board of Parole shall create and maintain a
brief public record of each gathering under this subsection. Such record
shall include, at a minimum, the date of the gathering, general topics
discussed, and the participants. Such record shall be made available to
any person upon request.
-2-

LB763 LB763
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Original section 83-196, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-